Arkansas, session 2025, HB1019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Affordable Childcare Act of 2025 — Employer childcare
assistance tax credit.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Affordable
Childcare Act of 2025".
(b)(1) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in the amount determined under subsection (c) of this
section for a business that pays for or provides childcare for the dependent
children of its employees.
(2) To qualify for the income tax credit allowed under this
*CEB009*
01-16-2025 14:18:26 CEB009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1019
section, the childcare must be provided by a childcare facility that is
licensed under the Childcare Facility Licensing Act, § 20-78-201 et seq.
(c) The income tax credit allowed under this section is allowed in
amounts equal to the following:
(1) Thirty percent (30%) of the total amount expended by a
business for childcare services purchased to provide care for the dependent
children of its employees or for the provision of the service of locating
childcare services for the dependent children of its employees;
(2)(A) In the tax year in which a facility providing childcare
services for use primarily by the dependent children of employees is
established by a business independently or in conjunction with one or more
other businesses, fifty percent (50%) of the total amount expended by a
business in the establishment and operation of the facility.
(B) In tax years other than the tax year in which a
childcare facility is established under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this
section, the income tax credit allowed under this section is equal to thirty
percent (30%) of the total amount expended by a business for the operation of
a childcare facility less the amount of moneys received by the business for
use of the facility for childcare services; and
(3) Fifty percent (50%) of the total amount expended by a
business as payments to an organization providing access to available
childcare services for the business’s employees.
(d)(1) The credit allowed by subdivisions (c)(1) and (c)(2)(B) of this
section shall not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for any business
during any tax year.
(2) The credit allowed by subdivisions (c)(2)(A) and (c)(3) of
this section shall not exceed forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) for any
business during any tax year.
(e) If the amount of the income tax credit allowed under this section
exceeds the business's income tax liability, the excess shall be refunded to
the business.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 26-51-507 and 26-51-508 are repealed.
26-51-507. Employer-provided child care — As qualified under former §
26-52-401 — Definition.
(a) A business which qualifies for the exemption from the gross
01-16-2025 14:18:26 CEB009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1019
receipts tax under former § 26-52-401(29) shall be allowed an income tax
credit of three and nine-tenths percent (3.9%) of the annual salary of
employees employed exclusively in providing childcare services.
(b) If two (2) or more businesses participate in a childcare program
for their employees as provided by former § 26-52-401(29), then each business
will be allowed an income tax credit of three and nine-tenths percent (3.9%)
of the annual salary of only those employees who are on the respective
business' payroll and are employed exclusively for providing childcare
services.
(c)(1) To qualify for the income tax credit, the revenue to the
business or businesses from the childcare facility cannot exceed the direct
operating costs of the facility. If, on an annual basis, the childcare
facility receives revenue which exceeds the direct operating costs of the
facility, the business or businesses will not be entitled to the income tax
credit.
(2) As used in this section, “direct operating costs” means:
(A) The cost of food and beverages provided to the
children;
(B) The cost of labor for personnel whose services are
performed exclusively on the premises of the childcare facility for the care
of the children and all related employment taxes paid by the employer; and
(C) All materials and supplies necessary to operate the
childcare facility.
(d) The income tax credit created by subsection (a) of this section
shall first be available in the taxable year following the year the business
makes payment of wages to childcare workers. To the extent that the credit is
not fully utilized in this first year, it may be carried forward for an
additional two (2) years. Any credit remaining thereafter shall expire.
(e) The income tax provisions of this section shall be in full force
and effect for all income tax years beginning on and after January 1, 1993.

26-51-508. Employer-provided child care — As qualified under § 26-52-
516 or § 26-53-132 — Definition.
(a) A business which qualifies for the refund of the gross receipts
tax or compensating use tax under § 26-52-516 or § 26-53-132 shall be allowed
an income tax credit of three and nine-tenths percent (3.9%) of the annual
01-16-2025 14:18:26 CEB009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1019
salary of its employees employed exclusively in providing childcare service,
or a five-thousand-dollar income tax credit for the first tax year the
business provides its employees with a childcare facility.
(b) If two (2) or more businesses participate in a childcare program
for their employees as provided by § 26-52-516 or § 26-53-132, then each
business will be allowed an income tax credit of three and nine-tenths
percent (3.9%) of the annual salary of only those employees who are on the
respective business' payroll and are employed exclusively for providing
childcare services. The first year's five-thousand-dollar credit will be
prorated among the businesses based upon the percentage of the cost paid by
each business for the initial construction and equipping of the childcare
facility.
(c)(1)(A) To qualify for the income tax credit, the revenue to the
business or businesses from the childcare facility cannot exceed the direct
operating costs of the facility.
(B) If, on an annual basis, the business receives revenues
from the operation of the childcare facility which exceed the direct
operating costs of the facility, the businesses will not be entitled to the
income tax credit.
(2) As used in this subsection, “direct operating costs” means:
(A) The cost of food and beverages provided to the
children;
(B) The cost of labor for personnel whose services are
performed exclusively on the premises of the childcare facility for the care
of the children and all related employment taxes paid by the employer; and
(C) All materials and supplies necessary to operate the
childcare facility.
(d) The income tax credit created by subsection (a) of this section
shall first be available in the taxable year following the year the business
makes payment of wages to childcare workers. To the extent that the credit is
not fully utilized in this first year, it may be carried forward for an
additional two (2) years. Any credit remaining thereafter shall expire.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

01-16-2025 14:18:26 CEB009

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1019
/s/D.Garner



































01-16-2025 14:18:26 CEB009